Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4891.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299F.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4d. new text end new text begin School safety. new text end new text begin The commissioner must adopt rules as part of the State Fire Code requiring schools to protect students from armed attack with a comprehensive, multilayered, integrated security system. The specific requirements must be determined during the rulemaking process and may include without limitation the following: new text end new text begin (1) bullet-resistant interior doors and windows; new text end new text begin (2) ballistic wall panels; new text end new text begin (3) magnetic door-locking systems; new text end new text begin (4) remote lock-down activation systems; new text end new text begin (5) a mass notification system unified with an emergency communication system; new text end new text begin (6) an emergency building access system for first responders, including fire, emergency medical services, and law enforcement personnel; new text end new text begin (7) an access control system with remote door-release capabilities; new text end new text begin (8) electronic access controls for main distribution frame and independent distribution frame rooms with a key override; new text end new text begin (9) classroom duress alarms linked to a law enforcement and administration notification system; new text end new text begin (10) security system training for staff to initiate emergency protocols; new text end new text begin (11) ballistic security glass for interior door vision panels and sidelites; new text end new text begin (12) electronic access control systems for primary building entrances; and new text end new text begin (13) classroom door installations that optimize safety and security. new text end